Utah statutes.
29-1-2.   Property worth more than $250 -- Limitation of liability --
Special arrangements -- Theft by, or negligence of, innkeeper or servant.
An innkeeper, hotel keeper, boarding house or lodging house keeper shall not
be obliged to receive from a guest for deposit in such safe or vault, property
described in the next preceding section exceeding a total value of two hundred
fifty dollars ($250), and shall not be liable for such property exceeding such
value whether received or not. Such innkeeper, hotel keeper, boarding house or
lodging house keeper, by special arrangement with a guest, may receive for
deposit in such safe or vault property upon such written terms as may be
agreed upon. An innkeeper, hotel keeper, boarding house or lodging  house
keeper shall be liable for a loss of any of such property of a guest in  his
inn caused by the theft or negligence of the innkeeper or his servant.
